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DTC C 1718 / 18 Fluid Pressure Sensor Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
This circuit is sending the data to detect the pressure output from the pump and to judge the abnormality
of the fluid pressure by the ECU.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1718 / 18

Eitherof the following 1.or2. isdetected:
1.Whendetecting theabnormalsignal fromthe fluidpressure

sensor (Fluid pressure sensor terminal voltage of ECU is
0.3Vor lessor4.7Vormore) forevery0.0 1 sec.and that
conditioncontinued for 1 sec.

2.While themotor relay isnon −operating, thecondition that
the fluidpressureexceeds 1 MPa( 10.2kg/cm

2
, 145psi)

continued for 10secs.

SFluidpressuresensor
SFluidpressuresensorcircuit
SSuspensioncontrolECU

Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the fluid pressure sensor circuit, the height control is prohibited after the ECU has adjusted
the vehicle height to the standard.
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WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkoutputvalueof fluidpressuresensor.

PREPARATION:
Remove thesuspensioncontrolECUwithconnectorsstill con-
nected.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(b) Measure voltage between terminals SHB and SHG of

suspension control ECU connector.
OK:

Voltage:Approx.5V

NG Check and replace suspension control ECU.

OK

2 Check fluid pressure sensor.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the fluid pressure sensor connector.
CHECK:
(a)Connect3drybatteriesof 1.5V inseries.
(b) Connect terminal 3 to the batteries’ positive (+) terminal,

and terminal 1 to thebatteries’negative ( −) terminal, then
applyvoltageabout4.5Vbetween terminals 1 and3.

(c)Measurevoltagebetween terminals 1 and2.
OK:

Voltage: Approx. 4.5 V

NG Replace fluid pressure sensor.

OK
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3 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between fluid pres-
sure sensor, height control sensor, fluid temp. sensor and suspension control
ECU (See page IN−35).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Clear the DTC (See page DI−208).


